Indiana, session 2026, HB1198.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-31.5-2-130.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 130.3. "Female", for purposes of
IC 35-43-2.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-43-2.5-1.
SECTION 2. IC 35-31.5-2-191.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 191.3. "Male", for purposes of
IC 35-43-2.5, has the meaning set forth in IC 35-43-2.5-2.
SECTION 3. IC 35-43-2.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 2.5. Single Sex Public Restroom Trespass
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "female" means an individual
who:
(1) was born female at birth; or
(2) has at least one (1) X chromosome and no Y chromosome.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "male" means an individual who:
2026 IN 1198—LS 6601/DI 149


(1) was born male at birth; or
(2) has at least one (1) X chromosome and at least one (1) Y
chromosome.
Sec. 3. A:
(1) male who knowingly or intentionally enters a restroom
that is designated to be used only by females; or
(2) female who knowingly or intentionally enters a restroom
that is designated to be used only by males;
commits restroom trespass, a Class B misdemeanor.
Sec. 4. (a) It is a defense to a prosecution under this chapter if
a person enters a restroom designated only for the opposite gender:
(1) for custodial purposes; or
(2) to render assistance.
(b) It is a defense to a prosecution under this chapter if a person
who is less than twelve (12) years of age accompanies the person's:
(1) parent;
(2) guardian;
(3) custodian;
(4) teacher; or
(5) babysitter;
into a restroom designated for the gender of the person listed in
subdivisions (1) through (5).
2026 IN 1198—LS 6601/DI 149